Hawaii statutes.
§378-64 Remedies ordered by court. A
court, in rendering a judgment in an action brought pursuant to this part,
shall order, as the court considers appropriate, reinstatement of the employee
or public employee, payment of back wages, full reinstatement of fringe
benefits and seniority rights, actual damages, or any combination of these
remedies. A court may also award the complainant all or a portion of the costs
of litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees and witness fees, if the
court determines that the award is appropriate. [L 1987, c 267, pt of §1; am L
2011, c 166, §6]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next